Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0731.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 9.
DISTRIBUTED GENERATION AND STORAGE
Sec. 241. As used in this part:
(a) "Aggregator" means a party, other than an investor-owned
electric utility or its affiliate, that represents and aggregates
grid services provided by distributed energy resources, including
eligible electric generators and demand response resources.
(b) "Behind-the-meter eligible electric generator" means an
eligible electric generator that is connected to the customer's
RMH S01936'25 (S-1) cgxzu6


electrical load and located on the customer side of the customer
meter.
(c) "Demand response resource" means an application or
solution that can be controlled to respond to pricing or to provide
services, including demand response functions.
(d) "Distributed energy resource" means a device or technology
that interfaces with and is connected to a distribution system
through connection to an electric utility's wiring or an end-use
customer's system. Distributed energy resource includes eligible
electric generators and energy storage systems capable of exporting
active power to a distribution system or providing demand response
functions.
(e) "Eligible electric generator" means a customer's renewable
energy system, energy storage system, electric vehicle,
cogeneration facility, or waste heat recovery system, which may be
coupled to or colocated with an energy storage system, that meets
both of the following requirements:
(i) Is located in this state.
(ii) Has a generation capacity that is consistent with the
safety and reliability requirements of the customer's
interconnection.
(f) "Energy storage system" means any technology that is
capable of absorbing energy, storing the energy for a period of
time, and then redelivering the energy. Energy storage system does
not include either of the following:
(i) Fossil fuel storage.
(ii) Power-to-gas storage that directly uses fossil fuel
inputs.
(g) "Enterprise distributed energy resources management
RMH S01936'25 (S-1) cgxzu6


system" means a platform operated by the electric utility that
interfaces with a grid-edge distributed energy resources management
system to communicate with or control distributed energy resources.
(h) "Grid-edge distributed energy resources management system"
means a platform owned by a party other than the electric utility
that may be used to communicate with or control distributed energy
resources or demand response resources.
(i) "Program event" means a period of time during which an
aggregator is required to provide grid services in response to a
notification provided by the electric utility.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02283'25) or House Bill
No. ____ (request no. H02283'25) of the 103rd Legislature is
enacted into law.
Final Page
RMH S01936'25 (S-1) cgxzu6